Utah statutes.
54-3-19.   Long and short distance service -- Through and intermediate
rates.

(1)  A telephone or telegraph corporation  may not charge or receive any
greater compensation, in the aggregate, for the transmission of any long
distance message or conversation for a shorter than for a longer distance over
the same line or route in the same direction within this state, the shorter
being included within the longer distance; or charge any greater compensation
for a through service than the aggregate of the intermediate rates or tolls;
but this shall not be construed as authorizing any telephone or telegraph
corporation to charge or receive as great a compensation for a shorter as for
a longer distance.
(2)  Upon application to the commission any telegraph or telephone corporation
may in special cases, after investigation, be authorized by the commission to
charge less for a longer than for a shorter distance service for the
transmission of messages or conversations, and the commission may from time to
time prescribe the extent to which the telegraph or telephone corporation may
be relieved from the operation and requirements of this section.
